Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-710.02
Sickness and accident insurance; insurer domiciled in state; delivery in another state; approval.

If any policy of sickness and accident insurance is issued by an insurer domiciled in this state for delivery to a person residing in another state and if the official having responsibility for the administration of the insurance laws of such other state has advised the Director of Insurance that any such policy is not subject to approval or disapproval by such official, the Director of Insurance may by ruling require that such policy meet the standards set forth in sections 44-710.01 and 44-710.03 to 44-710.09.

Laws 1957, c. 188, § 3, p. 644;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 132.